Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 9.1-108.
Criminal Justice Services Board membership; terms; vacancies; members not disqualified from holding other offices; designation of chairmen; meetings; compensation.

The Criminal Justice Services Board is established as a policy board within the meaning of §

2.2-2100

, in the executive branch of state government. The Board shall consist of 32 members as follows: the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Virginia, or his designee; the Attorney General or his designee; the Superintendent of the Department of State Police; the Director of the Department of Corrections; the Director of the Department of Juvenile Justice; the Chairman of the Parole Board; the Executive Director of the Virginia Indigent Defense Commission or his designee; and the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia. In those instances in which the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia, the Superintendent of the Department of State Police, the Director of the Department of Corrections, the Director of the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the Chairman of the Parole Board will be absent from a Board meeting, he may appoint a member of his staff to represent him at the meeting.Twenty members shall be appointed by the Governor from among citizens of the Commonwealth. At least one shall be a representative of a crime victims’ organization or a victim of crime as defined in subsection B of §

19.2-11.01

, one shall be a representative of a social justice organization that is engaged in advancing inclusion and human rights, one shall be a mental health service provider, and two shall represent community interests, at least one of whom shall represent the community interests of minority individuals from one of the four groups defined in subsection F of §

2.2-4310

. The remainder shall be representative of the broad categories of state and local governments, criminal justice systems, and law-enforcement agencies, including but not limited to, police officials, sheriffs, attorneys for the Commonwealth, defense counsel, the judiciary, correctional and rehabilitative activities, and other locally elected and appointed administrative and legislative officials. Among these members there shall be two sheriffs representing the Virginia Sheriffs’ Association selected from among names submitted by the Association; one member who is an active duty law-enforcement officer appointed after consideration of the names, if any, submitted by police or fraternal associations that have memberships of at least 1,000; two representatives of the Virginia Association of Chiefs of Police appointed after consideration of the names submitted by the Association, if any; one attorney for the Commonwealth appointed after consideration of the names submitted by the Virginia Association of Commonwealth’s Attorneys, if any; one person who is a mayor, city or town manager, or member of a city or town council representing the Virginia Municipal League appointed after consideration of the names submitted by the League, if any; one person who is a county executive, manager, or member of a county board of supervisors representing the Virginia Association of Counties appointed after consideration of the names submitted by the Association, if any; one member representing the Virginia Association of Campus Law Enforcement Administrators appointed after consideration of the names submitted by the Association, if any; one member of the Private Security Services Advisory Board; and one representative of the Virginia Association of Regional Jails appointed after consideration of the names submitted by the Association, if any.Four members of the Board shall be members of the General Assembly appointed as follows: one member of the House Committee on Appropriations appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates after consideration of the recommendation by the committee’s chairman; one member of the House Committee for Courts of Justice appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates after consideration of the recommendation by the committee’s chairman; one member of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules after consideration of the recommendation of the chairman of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations; and one member of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules after consideration of the recommendation of the chairman of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary. The legislative members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office and shall serve as ex officio, nonvoting members. Legislative members may be reappointed for successive terms.

The members of the Board appointed by the Governor shall serve for terms of four years, provided that no member shall serve beyond the time when he holds the office or employment by reason of which he was initially eligible for appointment. Gubernatorial appointed members of the Board shall not be eligible to serve for more than two consecutive full terms. Three or more years within a four-year period shall be deemed a full term. Any vacancy on the Board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment, but for the unexpired term.

The Governor shall appoint a chairman of the Board for a two-year term. No member shall be eligible to serve more than two consecutive terms as chairman. The Board shall designate one or more vice-chairmen from among its members, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Board.

Notwithstanding any provision of any statute, ordinance, local law, or charter provision to the contrary, membership on the Board shall not disqualify any member from holding any other public office or employment, or cause the forfeiture thereof.

The Board shall hold no less than four regular meetings a year. Subject to the requirements of this subsection, the chairman shall fix the times and places of meetings, either on his own motion or upon written request of any five members of the Board.

The Board may adopt bylaws for its operation.

Legislative members of the Board shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12 and nonlegislative citizen members shall receive such compensation as provided in §

2.2-2813

for the performance of their duties. All members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Department of Criminal Justice Services.

History.

1981, c. 632, § 9-168; 1984, cc. 30, 515, 538, 734; 1986, c. 519; 1987, c. 144; 1989, c. 733; 1990, c. 98; 1991, cc. 59, 685; 1993, c. 415; 1994, cc. 20, 226; 1997, cc. 32, 795, 883; 1999, c. 495; 2001, c. 844; 2004, c. 1000; 2005, cc. 594, 672; 2011, cc. 594, 681, 691, 714; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2017, c. 206; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 28, 37; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 467.

Cross references.

As to prohibition against service by legislators on boards, commissions, and councils, and exceptions thereto, see §

2.2-2101

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 1000, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments or appointments to fill vacancies made after the effective date of this act shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2011, cc. 691 and 714, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act providing for (i) staggered terms for board, council, or commission members and (ii) two-year terms for chairmen appointed by the Governor shall not affect current members or chairmen whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2017, c. 206, cl. 2 provides: “That the Secretary of Public Safety and Homeland Security shall, in consultation with the Governor, review the current composition of the Criminal Justice Services Board and develop a plan for the restructuring of the Board in order to improve its efficiency in carrying out its duties. The Secretary of Public Safety and Homeland Security shall submit the plan by December 1, 2017, to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees for Courts of Justice.”

Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000, in subsection A, substituted “27” for “twenty-seven” in the second sentence in the first paragraph, in the second paragraph, substituted “citizens” for “residents” in the first sentence and “Virginia Sheriffs Association” for “Virginia State Sheriffs Association,” six times substituted “appointed after consideration of the” for “selected from among” and six times inserted “if any,” and rewrote the last paragraph; inserted “Gubernatorial” in the second sentence of subsection B; and rewrote subsection G.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 594 substituted “28 members” for “27 members” and inserted “the Executive Director of the Virginia Indigent Defense Commission or his designee” in subsection A.

The 2005 amendment by c. 672, in subsection A, substituted “28 members” for “27 members” in the first paragraph and in the second paragraph of subsection A, substituted “Sixteen members” for “Fifteen members” and inserted “one member who is an active duty law-enforcement officer appointed after consideration of the names, if any, submitted by police or fraternal associations that have memberships of at least 1,000.”

The first paragraph of subsection A is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 594 and 681 are identical, and substituted “Virginia Association of Regional Jails” for “Virginia Association of Regional Jail Superintendents” at the end in the second paragraph in subsection A.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 691 and 714 are identical, and in the second paragraph of subsection A, substituted “Virginia Association of Chiefs of Police” for “Chiefs of Police Association,” “Virginia Association of Regional Jails” for “Virginia Association of Regional Jail Superintendents,” and inserted “Virginia” preceding “Association of Commonwealth’s Attorneys, if any,” in the last sentence; rewrote subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 99, are identical, and twice deleted “the Superintendent of the Department of Correctional Education” following “Department of Juvenile Justice” in the first paragraph of subsection A.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 206, in subsection A, substituted “29 members” for “28 members” in the second sentence of the first paragraph, in the second paragraph, substituted “Seventeen” for “Sixteen” in the first sentence, inserted “and one shall represent community interests” in the second sentence, and substituted “Virginia Association of Campus Law Enforcement Administrators” for “Virginia Crime Prevention Association” in the third sentence.

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 28, effective March 1, 2021, in A, substituted “32” for “29” in the first paragraph; in the second paragraph, substituted “Twenty” for “Seventeen” in the first sentence, and substituted “one shall be a representative of a social justice organization, one shall be a mental health service provider, and two shall represent community interests, at least one of whom shall represent the community interests of minority individuals from one of the four groups defined in subsection F of §

2.2-4310

” for “one” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, effective March 1, 2021, in A, substituted “32” for “29” in the first paragraph; in the second paragraph, substituted “Twenty” for “Seventeen” in the first sentence, and substituted “one shall be a representative of a social justice organization, one shall be a mental health service provider, and two shall represent community interests, at least one of whom shall represent the community interests of minority individuals from one of the four groups defined in subsection F of §

2.2-4310

” for “one” in the second sentence; in the third paragraph, inserted “the” following “Speaker of,” inserted “and Appropriations” twice, and substituted “on the Judiciary” for “for Courts of Justice” twice.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 467, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “that is engaged in advancing inclusion and human rights” in the first sentence of the second paragraph in subsection A.

§ 9.1-108.1.
Executive Committee; authority; effect of certain actions.

The Board may establish an Executive Committee consisting of the Chairman and seven members of the Board appointed by the Chair. The Chair shall serve a term coincident with his term of office as Chairman of the Board and the other members of the Executive Committee shall serve terms of two years. Five members of the Executive Committee shall constitute a quorum.

The Executive Committee shall have the authority to take any action authorized by this chapter including, but not limited to, hearing appeals by a regulant of a determination of a violation of regulations promulgated by the Board.

Any decision rendered by the Executive Committee on appeals by a regulant of a determination of a violation of regulations promulgated by the Board shall have the same effect as if made by the Board and shall be subject to judicial review in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).All other actions of the Executive Committee shall be acted upon by the full Board as soon as practicable.

History.

2008, c. 305.

§ 9.1-109.
Administration of federal programs.

The Board is designated as the supervisory board and the Department is designated as the planning and coordinating agency responsible for the implementation and administration of any federal programs for strengthening and improving law enforcement, the administration of criminal justice, and delinquency prevention and control throughout the Commonwealth.

History.

1981, c. 632, § 9-171; 2001, c. 844.

§ 9.1-110.
School Resource Officer Grants Program and Fund.

From the funds appropriated for such purpose and from the gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds received on its behalf, there is established (i) the School Resource Officer Grants Program, to be administered by the Board, in consultation with the Board of Education, and (ii) a special nonreverting fund within the state treasury known as the School Resource Officer Incentive Grants Fund, hereinafter known as the “Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller, and any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such funds shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it.Subject to the authority of the Board to provide for its disbursement, the Fund shall be disbursed to award matching grants to local law-enforcement agencies and local school boards that have established a collaborative agreement to employ uniformed school resource officers, as defined in §

9.1-101

, in middle and high schools within the relevant school division. The Board may disburse annually up to five percent of the Fund for the training of the school resource officers. School resource officers shall be certified law-enforcement officers and shall be employed to help ensure safety and prevent truancy and violence in schools.

The Board shall establish criteria for making grants from the Fund, including procedures for determining the amount of a grant and the required local match. Any grant of general funds shall be matched by the locality on the basis of the composite index of local ability to pay. The Board may adopt guidelines governing the Program and the employment and duties of the school resource officers as it deems necessary and appropriate.

History.

1999, c. 512, § 9-171.1; 2000, c. 785; 2001, cc. 33, 844; 2002, cc. 836, 868; 2016, c. 466.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 33 amended former § 9-171.1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2001, c. 33 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2001 amendment by c. 33 added the second sentence in the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 836 and 868 are identical, and inserted “as defined in §

9.1-101

” in the first sentence in the second paragraph in subsection A.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 466, in the last sentence of the second paragraph of subsection A, substituted “safety and prevent” for “safety to prevent,” deleted “and to enforce school board rules and codes of student conduct” from the end and made related changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

School resource officers for the county’s private schools. —

The local board of supervisors may provide school resource officers for the county’s private schools as well as the county’s public schools. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Michael W. Taylor, Sheriff, Pittsylvania County, 13-042, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 60 (7/19/13). But see opinion 19-005, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 26 (8/23/19), which states that to the extent this conclusion is inconsistent with that of a prior opinion of the Attorney General, the conclusion of the prior opinion is overruled.

A sheriff is not authorized to assign on-duty deputies to provide dedicated security for a private school, but a locality may adopt an ordinance that allows deputy sheriff’s to engage in off-duty employment that occasionally requires the exercise of police powers. Then under such an ordinance, a private school may employ off-duty deputy sheriff’s to provide security at the school, subject to rules as may be adopted by the locality or promulgated by the sheriff pursuant to §

15.2-1712

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable David L. Doughty Jr., Northampton County Sheriff,
19-005,
(8/23/19).

§ 9.1-111.
Advisory Committee on Juvenile Justice and Prevention; membership; terms; quorum; compensation and expenses; duties.

The Advisory Committee on Juvenile Justice and Prevention (the Advisory Committee) is established as an advisory committee in the executive branch of state government. The Advisory Committee shall have the responsibility for advising and assisting the Board, the Department, all agencies, departments, boards, and institutions of the Commonwealth, and units of local government, or combinations thereof, on matters related to the prevention and treatment of juvenile delinquency and the administration of juvenile justice in the Commonwealth.The membership of the Advisory Committee shall comply with the membership requirements contained in the federal Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act pursuant to 34 U.S.C. § 11133, as amended, and shall consist of the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services; the Commissioner of Social Services; the Director of the Department of Juvenile Justice; the Superintendent of Public Instruction; the Commissioner of Health; one member of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules after consideration of the recommendation of the Chairman of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary; one member of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates after consideration of the recommendation of the Chairman of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions; and such number of nonlegislative citizen members appointed by the Governor to comply with the membership range established by such federal act. The Advisory Committee may serve as an advisory committee as may be required by other federal or state laws or programs administered by the Department. Membership shall be adjusted as necessary to fulfill the requirements of such laws or programs.Legislative members, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and the agency directors shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. All other members shall be citizens of the Commonwealth and be appointed by the Governor for a term of four years. However, no member shall serve beyond the time when he holds the office or employment by reason of which he was initially eligible for appointment.The Advisory Committee shall elect its chairman and vice-chairman from among its members.

Gubernatorial appointed members of the Advisory Committee shall not be eligible to serve for more than two consecutive full terms. Three or more years within a four-year period shall be deemed a full term. Any vacancy on the Advisory Committee shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment, but for the unexpired term.

Twelve members of the Advisory Committee, including voting and nonvoting members, shall constitute a quorum.The Advisory Committee may adopt bylaws for its operation.

Members of the Advisory Committee shall not receive compensation but shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of the expenses shall be provided from federal or state funds received for such purposes by the Department of Criminal Justice Services.

The Advisory Committee shall have the duty and responsibility to:

Review the operation of the juvenile justice system and delinquency prevention activities in the Commonwealth, including facilities and programs, and prepare appropriate reports;

Review statewide plans, conduct studies, and make recommendations on needs and priorities for the development and improvement of the juvenile justice system and delinquency prevention in the Commonwealth; and

Advise on all matters related to the federal Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974 (P.L. 93-415, as amended), and recommend such actions on behalf of the Commonwealth as may seem desirable to secure benefits of that or other federal programs for delinquency prevention and the administration of juvenile justice.

The Department of Criminal Justice Services shall provide staff support to the Advisory Committee. Upon request, each administrative entity or collegial body within the executive branch of the state government shall cooperate with the Advisory Committee as it carries out its responsibilities.

History.

1981, c. 632, § 9-168; 1984, cc. 30, 515, 538, 734; 1986, c. 519; 1987, c. 144; 1989, c. 733; 1990, c. 98; 1991, cc. 59, 685; 1993, c. 415; 1994, cc. 20, 226; 1997, cc. 32, 795, 883; 1999, c. 495; 2001, c. 844; 2004, c. 1000; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2015, cc. 210, 419.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “34 U.S.C. § 11133” was substituted for “42 U.S.C. § 5633” in subsection A.

Acts 2004, c. 1000, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments or appointments to fill vacancies made after the effective date of this act shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on the Judiciary” for “Senate Committee for Courts of Justice” twice in subsection A. March 10, 2021.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 rewrote and divided the first sentence into the first and second sentences of the first paragraph of subsection A; rewrote the second paragraph of subsection A; in the third paragraph of subsection A, inserted “the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and the agency directors,” substituted “citizens” for “residents” and deleted the last sentence, which read: “The majority of the Advisory Committee shall be private citizens and at least three members of the Advisory Committee, including two private citizens, shall also be members of the Board.”; inserted “and vice-chairman” in the fourth paragraph of subsection A; added “Gubernatorial” to the beginning of subsection B; added the first sentence in subsections C and G; and in subsection E, substituted “performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

” for “discharge of their duties” and added the last sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services; the Commissioner of Social Services” for “the Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services; the Commissioner of the Department of Social Services” in the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 210 added “federal” preceding “Juvenile Justice and Delinquency” in the second paragraph of subsection A; in subsection C, rewrote the first paragraph, which read “The majority of the members of the Advisory Committee shall constitute a quorum. The Advisory Committee shall hold no less than four regular meetings a year. Subject to the requirements of this subsection, the chairman shall fix the times and places of meetings, either on his own motion or upon written request of any five members of the Advisory Committee” and transferred former subsection D as the last sentence in subsection C; redesignated former subsections E through G as subsections D through F; substituted “duty and responsibility” for “following duties and responsibilities” in subsection E; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment by c. 419 in subsection A, inserted “and Prevention” following “Justice” in the first paragraph, inserted “the Commissioner of Health” and added the last two sentences in the second paragraph; in subsection E, inserted “or state” preceding “funds”; in subdivision F 1, inserted “and delinquency prevention activities”; in subdivision F 2, inserted “and delinquency prevention”; substituted “and the administration of juvenile justice” for “of the administration of juvenile justice” in subdivision F 3; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 9.1-112.
Committee on Training; membership.

There is created a permanent Committee on Training under the Board that shall be the policy-making body responsible to the Board for effecting the provisions of subdivisions 2 through 17 of §

9.1-102

. The Committee on Training shall be composed of 19 members of the Board as follows: the Superintendent of the Department of State Police; the Director of the Department of Corrections; a member of the Private Security Services Advisory Board; the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia; two sheriffs representing the Virginia Sheriffs’ Association; two representatives of the Virginia Association of Chiefs of Police; the active-duty law-enforcement officer representing police and fraternal associations; the attorney for the Commonwealth representing the Virginia Association of Commonwealth’s Attorneys; an attorney representing the Virginia Indigent Defense Commission; a representative of the Virginia Municipal League; a representative of the Virginia Association of Counties; a mental health service provider; a regional jail superintendent representing the Virginia Association of Regional Jails; one citizen representing a social justice organization that is engaged in advancing inclusion and human rights; two citizens representing community interests, at least one of whom shall represent the community interests of minority individuals from one of the four groups defined in subsection F of §

2.2-4310

; and one member designated by the chairman of the Board from among the other appointments made by the Governor.

The Committee on Training shall annually elect its chairman from among its members.

The Committee on Training may appoint curriculum review committees to assist the Committee on Training in carrying out its duties under this section. Any curriculum review committee shall be composed of nine members appointed by the Committee on Training. At least one member shall be a representative from the Department of State Police Training Academy, one member shall be a representative of a regional criminal justice academy, one member shall be a representative of an independent criminal justice academy, and one member shall be a representative of a community-based organization. The remainder shall be selected from names submitted by the Department of individuals with relevant experience.

History.

1981, c. 632, § 9-168; 1984, cc. 30, 515, 538, 734; 1986, c. 519; 1987, c. 144; 1989, c. 733; 1990, c. 98; 1991, cc. 59, 685; 1993, c. 415; 1994, cc. 20, 226; 1997, cc. 32, 795, 883; 1999, c. 495; 2001, c. 844; 2007, c. 228; 2011, cc. 594, 681; 2012, c. 827; 2014, cc. 83, 535; 2017, c. 206; 2019, c. 366; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 28, 37; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 467.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 228, in the first paragraph, in the second sentence, substituted “14” for “thirteen” and inserted “the active-duty law-enforcement officer representing police and fraternal associations.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 594 and 681 are identical, and substituted “Association of Commonwealth’s Attorneys” for “Association for Attorneys for the Commonwealth” in the first paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 827, effective April 18, 2012, substituted “subdivisions 2 through 17 of §

9.1-102

” for “subdivisions 2 through 16 of §

9.1-102

” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 83 and 535 are identical, and in the first paragraph substituted “15” for “14” and inserted “the Director of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 206, in the second sentence, substituted “16 members” for “15 members” and inserted “one citizen representing community interests” near the end.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 366 substituted “15 members” for “16 members” and deleted “the Director of the Department of Juvenile Justice” following “of Corrections.”

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 28 and 37 are identical, effective March 1, 2021, and in the first paragraph, substituted “19” for “15,” substituted “Sheriffs’ ” for “State Sheriffs,” “Virginia Association of Chiefs of Police” for “Chiefs of Police Association,” inserted “an attorney representing the Virginia Indigent Defense Commission,” “a mental health service provider,” and “representing a social justice organization; two citizens representing community interests, at least one of whom shall represent the community interests of minority individuals from one of the four groups defined in subsection F of §

2.2-4310

”; and added the third paragraph.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 467, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “that is engaged in advancing inclusion and human rights” in the first paragraph.

§ 9.1-112.1.
Criminal justice training academies; curriculum.

Any criminal justice training academy approved by the Department shall employ the uniform curriculum and lesson plans developed by the Department pursuant to §

9.1-102

for all training offered at the academy intended to meet the compulsory minimum entry-level, in-service, and advanced training standards established by the Board pursuant to §

9.1-102

. No credit shall be given toward the completion of the compulsory minimum training standards for any training that does not employ the uniform curriculum and lesson plans.

In addition to any audits or inspections conducted by the Department, the Department shall conduct an annual evaluation of each criminal justice training academy’s compliance with the uniform curriculum and lesson plans. If the Department determines that a criminal justice training academy is deficient in employing the uniform curriculum and lesson plans, the Department shall provide assistance to the academy to ensure the academy’s compliance and may take whatever enforcement action the Department deems appropriate, including revocation of the Department’s approval of the academy.

Any approved criminal justice training academy may petition the Department for a waiver exempting compliance with any uniform curriculum and lesson plans requirement pursuant to §

9.1-102

. Upon showing that an alternative curriculum and lesson plans developed by the petitioning criminal justice training academy meet and exceed the compulsory minimum training standards required by §

9.1-102

and substantially complies with the content of the uniform curriculum and lesson plans, then the Department shall issue a waiver for the use of the alternative curriculum and lesson plans. The Department shall conduct an evaluation of each criminal justice training academy’s use of an alternative curriculum and lesson plans every third year during the criminal justice training academy’s recertification to ensure compliance with the uniform curriculum and lesson plans content. If the Department determines that the criminal justice training academy is in substantial compliance with the uniform curriculum and lesson plans, the waiver shall be extended for three years. Any waiver issued to a criminal justice training academy may be revoked by the Department at any time if the Department determines that the criminal justice training academy is not in substantial compliance with the uniform curriculum and lesson plans.

History.

2020, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 37, 48.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Effective date.

This section is effective March 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 9.1-113.
Compliance with minimum training standards by certain officers; exceptions.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to require (i) law-enforcement officers serving under permanent appointment on July 1, 1971, (ii) officers serving under permanent appointment under the provisions of § 56-353 appointed prior to July 1, 1982, or (iii) officers serving under permanent appointment under the provisions of § 10.1-115 appointed prior to July 1, 2003; to meet the compulsory minimum training standards provided for in subdivision 2 of §

9.1-102

. Nor shall failure of any such officer to meet such standards make him ineligible for any promotional examination for which he is otherwise eligible. However, any law-enforcement officer designated under the provisions of §

53.1-120

to provide courthouse and courtroom security shall be required to meet the standards provided under subdivision 7 of §

9.1-102

. Any full-time deputy sheriff who is a law-enforcement officer and who is exempted from the compulsory minimum training standards under this section shall be eligible for the minimum salary established pursuant to Article 3 (§

15.2-1609

et seq.) of Chapter 16 of Title 15.2.

History.

1981, c. 632, § 9-179; 1982, c. 419; 1984, c. 779; 1999, c. 495; 2001, c. 844; 2003, c. 744.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 744, in the first sentence, deleted “or” at the end of clause (i), added “or” at the end of clause (ii), and added clause (iii).

§ 9.1-114.
Compliance with minimum training standards by officers employed after July 1, 1971, by officers appointed under § 56-353 after July 1, 1982, and by part-time officers.

Every full-time law-enforcement officer employed after July 1, 1971, officers appointed under the provisions of § 56-353 after July 1, 1982, and every part-time law-enforcement officer employed after July 1, 1989, shall comply with the compulsory minimum training standards established by the Board within a period of time fixed by the Board in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). However, any part-time law-enforcement officer employed for eighty, or fewer, compensated hours in a calendar year, or any noncompensated auxiliary deputy sheriff, or noncompensated auxiliary police officer who carries a firearm in the course of his employment shall be required to have completed basic firearms training and received ongoing in-service firearms training, as defined by the Board. The Board may require law-enforcement agencies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions to submit rosters of their personnel and pertinent data with regard to the training status of such personnel.

History.

1981, c. 632, § 9-180; 1982, c. 419; 1989, c. 233; 2001, c. 844.

Cross references.

As to Commissioning of Breaks Interstate Park Commission employees as conservation officers, see § 10.1-120.

§ 9.1-114.1.
Compliance with minimum training standards by school resource officers.

Every full-time or part-time law-enforcement officer employed as a school resource officer after July 1, 2020, shall comply with the compulsory minimum training standards for school resource officers established by the Board within a period of time fixed by the Board. The Department shall ensure that such required training is available throughout the Commonwealth.

History.

2019, cc. 487, 488.